Massachusetts, session 194th, H1875.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by including the following definitions:- 
3  Blood alcohol content: The number of grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood; or 
4 the number of grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath; or the number of grams of alcohol per 67 
5 milliliters of urine. Blood alcohol content is also known as: blood alcohol level, blood alcohol 
6 concentration, and BAC. 
7  Disposition: A conviction, guilty plea, plea of nolo contendere, placement on probation, 
8 continuance without a finding or admission to sufficient facts. 
9  Drugs or other substance: Marijuana, narcotic drugs, depressants or stimulant substances, 
10 all as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C, or vapors of glue. 

2 of 69 11  Ignition interlock device: A breath alcohol sensing instrument designed to be mounted in 
12 an automobile and connected to the ignition key switching system in a way that prevents the 
13 vehicle from starting unless the driver first provides a breath sample. These devices contain an 
14 instrument to measure the alcohol content of a deep lung breath sample. If the measured blood 
15 alcohol content is at or above a set level, the ignition is locked and the vehicle will not start. For 
16 purposes of this chapter, the registrar will certify each model or device approved for use. 
17  Minimum mandatory: The term of a sentence that shall not be reduced or suspended nor 
18 shall any person be eligible for probation, parole, furlough, or receive any deduction for good 
19 conduct during that term provided; however, that the commissioner of correction may, on the 
20 recommendation of the warden, superintendent, or other person in charge of a correctional 
21 institution, or the administrator of a county correctional institution, grant to an offender 
22 committed a temporary release in the custody of an officer of such institution for the following 
23 purposes only: to attend the funeral of a relative; to visit a critically ill relative; to obtain 
24 emergency medical or psychiatric services unavailable at said institution; to engage in 
25 employment pursuant to a work release program; or for the purposes of an aftercare program 
26 designed to support the recovery of an offender who has completed an alcohol or controlled 
27 substance education, treatment, or rehabilitation program operated by the department of 
28 correction; and provided, further, that the defendant may serve all or party of such minimum 
29 mandatory sentence to the extent that resources are available in a correctional facility specifically 
30 designed by the department of correction for the incarceration and rehabilitation of drinking 
31 drivers. 
32  Open Container: A bottle, can or other receptacle used to contain a liquid that has been 
33 opened or has a broken seal or the contents of which have been partially removed or consumed; 

3 of 69 34 provided, however, that a bottle resealed pursuant to section 12 of chapter 138 shall not be 
35 considered an open container. 
36  Operating under the influence offense: Any conviction, nolo contendere plea, 
37 continuation without a finding with an assignment to an alcohol, drug or substance abuse 
38 education treatment program for operating under the influence under chapter 90, chapter 90A , 
39 chapter 90B, or chapter 265, or of a like offense of operating under the influence from another 
40 jurisdiction. 
41  Passenger Area: The area designed to seat the driver and passengers while the motor 
42 vehicle is in operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in 
43 a seated position including, but not limited to, the glove compartment; provided, however, that 
44 the passenger area shall not include a motor vehicle’s trunk or a locked glove compartment or, if 
45 a motor vehicle is not equipped with a trunk, the area behind the last upright seat or an area not 
46 normally occupied by the driver or passenger. 
47  Prior under the influence offense: Any conviction, nolo contendere plea, or continuation 
48 without a finding with an assignment to an alcohol, drug or substance abuse education treatment 
49 program for operating under the influence under chapter 90, chapter 90A, chapter 90B, or 
50 chapter 265 section 13 ½ , section 13 ½ , or of a like offense of operating under the influence 
51 from another jurisdiction, where the findings, judgment, or adjudication date by the court 
52 precedes the date of offense for which he is now charged. 
53  Public way: Any street or highway that is open to the public and is controlled and 
54 maintained by some level of government, or in a place to which the public has a right of access, 
55 or in a place to which members of the public have access as invitees or licensees. 

4 of 69 56  Under the Influence: (1) Having ingested enough marijuana, narcotic drugs, depressants 
57 or stimulant substances, all as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C, or intoxicating liquor or 
58 vapors of glue to diminish one’s capacity or ability to drive safely ; or (2) Having a blood alcohol 
59 content of .08% or above. 
60  Vehicle or vessel used in public transportation: Any train, passenger bus, school bus or 
61 other vehicle used to transport pupils, passenger ferry boat, water shuttle or other equipment used 
62 in public transportation owned by, or operated under the authority of the Massachusetts Bay 
63 Transportation Authority, the Woods Hole, Martha’s Vineyard and Nantucket Steamship 
64 Authority, Massachusetts Port Authority, or the Massachusetts Department of Transportation. 
65  SECTION 2. Section 23 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
66 amended by striking lines 1 through 144 and replacing it with the following:- 
67  (1) No person shall operate a motor vehicle with a suspended license or right to operate, 
68 or after being notified by the Registry of Motor Vehicles of such suspension. 
69  (a) A person convicted under subsection (1) of this section shall be punished as follows: 
70  (1) First offense: The defendant shall be fined not more than $500. 
71  (2) Subsequent offense: The defendant shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction 
72 for not less than 60 days but not more than 1 year. 
73  (b)Upon a conviction under subsection (1) of this section the registrar shall extend said 
74 suspension of the license or right to operate for an additional 60 days. 
75  (c) This paragraph shall not apply to any person who is charged with operating a motor 
76 vehicle after his license to operate has been suspended or revoked pursuant to a violation of 

5 of 69 77 paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of section 24, or section 24D, 24E, 24G, 24L or 24N of this 
78 chapter, subsection (a) of section 8 or section 8A or 8B of chapter 90B, section 8, 9 or 11 of 
79 chapter 90F or after notice of such suspension or revocation of his right to operate a motor 
80 vehicle without a license has been issued and received by such person or by his agent or 
81 employer, and prior to the restoration of such license or right to operate or the issuance to him of 
82 a new license or right to operate because of any such violation. 
83  (2)No person shall operate a motor vehicle with a suspended certificate of registration 
84 unless the registration has been restored or a new registration has been issued. 
85  (3)No person shall allow another to operate a motor vehicle with a suspended certificate 
86 of registration unless the registration has been restored or a new registration has been issued. 
87  (4)No person with intent to conceal his identity shall, upon request, present to an officer 
88 authorized to make arrests a license issued to another person. 
89  (a)A person convicted under subsection (2), (3) or (4) of this section shall be punished as 
90 follows: 
91  (1)First offense: The defendant shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for not 
92 more than 10 days, or fined not less than $500 but not more than $1000, or both. 
93  (2)Subsequent offense: The defendant shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction 
94 for not less than 60 days but not more than 1 year. 
95  (b)Upon a conviction under subsection (2), (3), or (4), of this section the registrar shall 
96 extend said suspension of the license or right to operate for an additional 60 days. 

6 of 69 97  (5)No person shall attach or permit to be attached to a motor vehicle or trailer a number 
98 plate assigned to another motor vehicle or trailer with the intent to conceal the identity of the 
99 motor vehicle or trailer. 
100  (6)No person shall obscure or permit to be obscured the figures on any number plate 
101 attached to a motor vehicle or trailer with the intent to conceal the identity of the motor vehicle 
102 or trailer. 
103  (7)No person shall fail to display a number plate and registration number duly assigned to 
104 a motor vehicle or trailer with the intent to conceal the identity of such motor vehicle or trailer. 
105  (a)A person convicted under subsection (5), (6), or (7) of this section shall be imprisoned 
106 in a jail or house of correction for not more than 10 days, or fined not more than $100, or both. 
107  (b)Upon a conviction under subsection (5), (6), or (7) of this section the registrar shall 
108 extend said suspension of the license or right to operate for an additional 60 days. 
109  (8)No person shall operate a motor vehicle with a suspended license or right to operate 
110 due to being a habitual traffic offender pursuant to section 22F of chapter 90 after being notified 
111 by the Registry of Motor Vehicles of such suspension. 
112  (a) A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
113 correction for not more than 2 years or fined not less than $500 but not more than $5000, or both. 
114  (b)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall extend said suspension of 
115 the license or right to operate for an additional 60 days. 

7 of 69 116  (9)No person shall operate a motor vehicle with a suspended license or right to operate 
117 due to a prior operating under the influence offense under chapter 90, 90B, 90F, or 265, or after 
118 being notified by the Registry of Motor Vehicles of such suspension. 
119  (a)A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
120 correction for a minimum mandatory term of 60 days but not more than 2 ½ years and fined not 
121 less than $1,000 but not more than $10,000. No case commenced under this subsection shall be 
122 continued without a finding or placed on file, or subject to the provisions of section 87 of chapter 
123 276. 
124  (b)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall extend said suspension of 
125 the license or right to operate for an additional 1 year. 
126  (10)No person shall operate a motor vehicle under the influence with a suspended license 
127 or right to operate due to a prior operating under the influence offense or after being notified by 
128 the Registry of Motor Vehicles of such suspension. 
129  (a)A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
130 correction for a minimum mandatory term of 1 year but not more than 2 ½ years and fined not 
131 less than $2,500 but not more than $10,000. No case commenced under this subsection shall be 
132 continued without a finding, or placed on file, or subject to the provisions of section 87 of 
133 chapter 276. 
134  (b)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall extend said suspension of 
135 the license or right to operate for an additional 1 year. 

8 of 69 136  (c)A sentence imposed under this subsection shall be served consecutively to and not 
137 concurrently with any other sentence or penalty. 
138  (11)A certificate of the registrar or his authorized agent indicating that: (1) a license or 
139 right to operate has not been restored; or (2) a certificate of registration has not been restored; or 
140 (3) a new license to operate has not been issued; or (4) a new certificate of registration has not 
141 been issued shall be admissible as evidence in any court of the commonwealth to prove the facts 
142 certified to therein. 
143  A certificate of a clerk of court that a person’s license or right to operate a motor vehicle 
144 was suspended for a period of time shall be admissible as prima facie evidence in any court of 
145 the commonwealth to prove the facts certified to therein. 
146  (12)In no case shall a person who fails to pay an administrative reinstatement fee without 
147 the registrar giving written prior notice mandating payment thereof, be prosecuted for operating 
148 after suspension of a license. 
149  (13) Upon a finding by the registrar that a person with a suspended license or right to 
150 operate, did operate a vehicle registered to another, the registrar shall, after hearing, suspend the 
151 certificate of registration of said motor vehicle for up to 30 days. Immediately, upon suspension, 
152 the certificate of registration and the number plates shall be surrendered to the registrar. 
153  SECTION 3. Section 24, 24 ½ , 24A, 24B, 24D, 24E, 24F, 24G, 24H, 24I, 24J, 24K, 24L, 
154 24M, 24N, 24O, 24P, 24Q, 24R, 24S, 24T, 24U, 24V, 24W, and 24X of chapter 90 of the 
155 General Laws, is hereby amended by striking each section and inserting in place thereof the 
156 following:- 

9 of 69 157  Chapter 90, § 24 - False statements in an application 
158  (1)No person shall falsely make, steal, alter, forge, or counterfeit, a learner’s permit, a 
159 license to operate a motor vehicle, an identification card issued under section 8E of this chapter, 
160 a special parking identification disability placard, a certificate of registration of a motor vehicle 
161 or trailer or an inspection sticker. 
162  (2)No person shall procure or assist another to falsely make, steal, alter, forge, or 
163 counterfeit, a learner’s permit, a license to operate a motor vehicle, an identification card issued 
164 under section 8E of this chapter, a special parking identification disability placard, a certificate of 
165 registration of a motor vehicle or trailer or an inspection sticker. 
166  (3)No person shall forge or use without authority the signature, a facsimile of the 
167 signature, or validating signature stamp of the registrar or a deputy registrar upon a genuine, 
168 falsely made, stolen, altered, forged, or counterfeited learner’s permit, license to operate a motor 
169 vehicle, identification card issued under section 8E of this chapter, a special parking 
170 identification disability placard, a certificate of registration of a motor vehicle or trailer, or an 
171 inspection sticker. 
172  (4)No person shall have in his possession, utter, publish as true, or in any way make use 
173 of a falsely made, stolen, altered, forged, or counterfeited learner’s permit, license to operate a 
174 motor vehicle, identification card issued under section 8E of this chapter, a special parking 
175 identification disability placard, a certificate of registration of a motor vehicle or trailer or an 
176 inspection sticker. 

10 of 69 177  (5)No person shall have in his possession, utter, publish as true, or in any way make use 
178 of a falsely made, stolen, altered, forged, or counterfeited signature, facsimile of the signature, or 
179 validating signature stamp of the registrar or a deputy registrar. 
180  (a)A person convicted under subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section shall be 
181 imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for not more than 2 years or state prison for not more 
182 than 5 years or fined not more than $500. 
183  (b)Upon a conviction under this section the registrar shall suspend the license or right to 
184 operate for 1 year. No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or 
185 right to operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in 
186 his favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 
187  (6)No person shall make any false statement in an application for a learner’s permit or 
188 license to operate a motor vehicle. 
189  (7)No person shall make any false statement in an application for a registration of a 
190 motor vehicle. 
191  (8)No person shall loan to or knowingly permit his learner’s permit or license to operate a 
192 motor vehicle to be used by another person. 
193  (a)A person convicted under subsection (6), (7), or (8) of this section shall be imprisoned 
194 in a jail or house of correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years, or fined not 
195 less than $20 but no more than $200, or both. 

11 of 69 196  (b)Upon a conviction under subsection (6), (7), or (8) of this section the registrar shall, 
197 unless the court or magistrate recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as 
198 follows: 
199  (1)First offense: 60 days 
200  (2)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 
201  No appeal or motion for new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
202 operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
203 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 
204  (c)A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a 
205 violation if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
206  Chapter 90, § 24A - Operation of a motor vehicle while drinking alcoholic beverage from 
207 open container 
208  (1)No person shall possess an open container or resealed bottle of alcoholic beverage in 
209 the passenger area of any motor vehicle while on a public way. 
210  (2)A person convicted under this section shall be fined not less than $100 but not more 
211 than $500. 
212  (3)This section shall not apply to passengers of a motor vehicle designed, maintained and 
213 used for the transportation of persons for compensation, or the living quarters of a house coach 
214 or house trailer. 

12 of 69 215  (4)Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the driver of any motor vehicle, 
216 including a house coach or house trailer, shall not possess an open container of alcoholic 
217 beverage. 
218  Chapter 90, § 24B (1) - Negligent/Reckless operation 
219  (1)No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public way negligently or recklessly so 
220 that the lives or safety of the public might be endangered. 
221  (2)A person convicted under this section shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
222 correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years or fined not less than $20 but not 
223 more than $200 dollars, or both. 
224  (3)Upon a conviction under this section the registrar shall, unless the court or magistrate 
225 recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
226  (a)First offense: 60 days 
227  (b)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 
228  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
229 operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
230 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 
231  (4)Upon a conviction of this subsection, if it appears by the records of the registrar that 
232 the person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor 
233 vehicle as a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of 
234 registration of any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 

13 of 69 235  (5)Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $250 fee to the person. 
236 The court shall deposit $187.50 of the $250 collected under this assessment into the Head Injury 
237 Treatment Services Trust Fund. The remaining $62.50 shall be deposited into the General Fund. 
238 The assessment shall not be subject to reduction or waiver by the court for any reason. 
239  A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a violation 
240 of this section if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
241  Chapter 90, § 24B (2) – Cell phone use while operating causing injury to a vehicle or 
242 property 
243  (1)No person shall operate a motor vehicle while using a mobile phone or any other 
244 handheld device capable of accessing the internet, to manually compose, send or receive an 
245 electronic message on any public way negligently so that the lives or safety of the public might 
246 be endangered and proximately cause injury to any vehicle or property. 
247  For the purposes of this section, an operator shall not be considered to be operating a 
248 motor vehicle if the vehicle is stationary and not located in a part of a public way intended for 
249 travel. 
250  (2)A person convicted of this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
251 correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years or fined not less than $20 but not 
252 more than $200, or both. 
253  (3)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or 
254 magistrate recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
255  (a)First offense: 60 days 

14 of 69 256  (b)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 
257  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
258 operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
259 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 
260  (4)Upon a conviction of this subsection, if it appears by the records of the registrar that 
261 the person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor 
262 vehicle as a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of 
263 registration of any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
264  (5)Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $250 fee to the person. 
265 The court shall deposit $187.50 of the $250 collected under this assessment into the Head Injury 
266 Treatment Services Trust Fund. The remaining $62.50 shall be deposited into the General Fund. 
267 The assessment shall not be subject to reduction or waiver by the court for any reason. 
268  A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a violation 
269 of this section if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
270  Chapter 90, § 24B (3) – Cell phone use while operating causing injury to another person 
271  (1)No person shall operate a motor vehicle while using a mobile phone or any other 
272 handheld device capable of accessing the internet, to manually compose, send or receive an 
273 electronic message on any public way negligently so that the lives or safety of the public might 
274 be endangered and proximately cause injury to any other person. 

15 of 69 275  For the purposes of this section, an operator shall not be considered to be operating a 
276 motor vehicle if the vehicle is stationary and not located in a part of a public way intended for 
277 travel. 
278  (2)A person convicted of this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
279 correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years or fined not less than $20 but not 
280 more than $200, or both. 
281  (3)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or 
282 magistrate recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
283  (a)First offense: 60 days 
284  (b)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 
285  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
286 operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
287 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 
288  (4)Upon a conviction of this subsection, if it appears by the records of the registrar that 
289 the person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor 
290 vehicle as a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of 
291 registration of any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
292  (5)Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $250 fee to the person. 
293 The court shall deposit $187.50 of the $250 collected under this assessment into the Head Injury 
294 Treatment Services Trust Fund. The remaining $62.50 shall be deposited into the General Fund. 
295 The assessment shall not be subject to reduction or waiver by the court for any reason. 

16 of 69 296  A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a violation 
297 of this section if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
298  Chapter 90, § 24B (4) – Cell phone by public transportation operator use while operating 
299 causing injury to a vehicle or property 
300  (1)No operator of a vehicle or vessel used in public transportation, including a train, 
301 passenger bus, school bus or other vehicle used to transport pupils, passenger ferry boat, water 
302 shuttle or other equipment used in public transportation owned by, or operated under the 
303 authority of the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, the Woods Hole, Martha’s 
304 Vineyard and Nantucket Steamship Authority, Massachusetts Port Authority, or the 
305 Massachusetts Department of Transportation, shall use a mobile telephone, hands-free mobile 
306 telephone or other mobile electronic device while operating such vehicle or vessel shall operate a 
307 motor vehicle while using a mobile phone or any other handheld device capable of accessing the 
308 internet, to manually compose, send or receive an electronic message on any public way 
309 negligently so that the lives or safety of the public might be endangered and proximately cause 
310 injury to any vehicle or property. 
311  This subsection shall not apply to the operator of a vehicle or vessel used in public 
312 transportation using a mobile telephone, hands-free mobile telephone or mobile electronic device 
313 in the performance of the operator’s official duties. 
314  In order for the use of any such device to be made “in the performance of the operator’s 
315 official duties,” such use must have been made in conformance with applicable written 
316 guidelines issued by a public entity listed in this paragraph relative to circumstances when 
317 operators are permitted to use said devices in the performance of their official duties or pursuant 

17 of 69 318 to directives from federal authorities having regulatory jurisdiction over such public entity’s 
319 operations. 
320  It shall be an affirmative defense for an operator under this section to produce evidence 
321 that the use of a mobile telephone that is the basis of the alleged violation was in the case of an 
322 emergency. For the purpose of this paragraph, an emergency shall mean that the operator needed 
323 to communicate with another to report any of the following: (1) that the vehicle or vessel was 
324 disabled; (2) that medical attention or assistance was required on the vehicle or vessel; (3) that 
325 police intervention, fire department or other emergency services was necessary for the personal 
326 safety of a passenger or to otherwise ensure the safety of the passengers; or (4) that a disabled 
327 vehicle or an accident was present on a roadway. 
328  (2)A person convicted of this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
329 correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years or fined not less than $20 but not 
330 more than $200, or both. 
331  (3)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or 
332 magistrate recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
333  (a)First offense: 60 days 
334  (b)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 
335  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
336 operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
337 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 

18 of 69 338  (4)Upon a conviction of this subsection, if it appears by the records of the registrar that 
339 the person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor 
340 vehicle as a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of 
341 registration of any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
342  (5)Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $250 fee to the person. 
343 The court shall deposit $187.50 of the $250 collected under this assessment into the Head Injury 
344 Treatment Services Trust Fund. The remaining $62.50 shall be deposited into the General Fund. 
345 The assessment shall not be subject to reduction or waiver by the court for any reason. 
346  A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a violation 
347 of this section if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
348  Chapter 90, § 24B (5) – Cell phone use by public transportation operator while operating 
349 causing injury to another person 
350  (1) No operator of a vehicle or vessel used in public transportation, including a train, 
351 passenger bus, school bus or other vehicle used to transport pupils, passenger ferry boat, water 
352 shuttle or other equipment used in public transportation owned by, or operated under the 
353 authority of the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, the Woods Hole, Martha’s 
354 Vineyard and Nantucket Steamship Authority, Massachusetts Port Authority, or the 
355 Massachusetts Department of Transportation, shall use a mobile telephone, hands-free mobile 
356 telephone or other mobile electronic device while operating such vehicle or vessel shall operate a 
357 motor vehicle while using a mobile phone or any other handheld device capable of accessing the 
358 internet, to manually compose, send or receive an electronic message on any public way 

19 of 69 359 negligently so that the lives or safety of the public might be endangered and proximately cause 
360 injury to any other person. 
361  This subsection shall not apply to the operator of a vehicle or vessel used in public 
362 transportation using a mobile telephone, hands-free mobile telephone or mobile electronic device 
363 in the performance of the operator’s official duties. 
364  In order for the use of any such device to be made “in the performance of the operator’s 
365 official duties,” such use must have been made in conformance with applicable written 
366 guidelines issued by a public entity listed in this paragraph relative to circumstances when 
367 operators are permitted to use said devices in the performance of their official duties or pursuant 
368 to directives from federal authorities having regulatory jurisdiction over such public entity’s 
369 operations. 
370  It shall be an affirmative defense for an operator under this section to produce evidence 
371 that the use of a mobile telephone that is the basis of the alleged violation was in the case of an 
372 emergency. For the purpose of this paragraph, an emergency shall mean that the operator needed 
373 to communicate with another to report any of the following: (1) that the vehicle or vessel was 
374 disabled; (2) that medical attention or assistance was required on the vehicle or vessel; (3) that 
375 police intervention, fire department or other emergency services was necessary for the personal 
376 safety of a passenger or to otherwise ensure the safety of the passengers; or (4) that a disabled 
377 vehicle or an accident was present on a roadway. 
378  (2)A person convicted of this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
379 correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years or fined not less than $20 but not 
380 more than $200, or both. 

20 of 69 381  (3)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or 
382 magistrate recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
383  (a)First offense: 60 days 
384  (b)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 
385  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
386 operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
387 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 
388  (4)Upon a conviction of this subsection, if it appears by the records of the registrar that 
389 the person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor 
390 vehicle as a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of 
391 registration of any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
392  (5)Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $250 fee to the person. 
393 The court shall deposit $187.50 of the $250 collected under this assessment into the Head Injury 
394 Treatment Services Trust Fund. The remaining $62.50 shall be deposited into the General Fund. 
395 The assessment shall not be subject to reduction or waiver by the court for any reason. 
396  A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a violation 
397 of this section if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
398  Chapter 90, § 24B (6) – Cell phone use by a person under 18 years of age while operating 
399 causing injury to a vehicle or property 
400  (1)No person under 18 years of age shall operate a motor vehicle while using a mobile 
401 phone or any other handheld device capable of accessing the internet, to manually compose, send 

21 of 69 402 or receive an electronic message on any public way negligently so that the lives or safety of the 
403 public might be endangered and proximately cause injury to a vehicle or property. 
404  For the purposes of this section, an operator shall not be considered to be operating a 
405 motor vehicle if the vehicle is stationary and not located in a part of a public way intended for 
406 travel. 
407  It shall be an affirmative defense for an operator to produce evidence that the use of a 
408 mobile telephone, hands-free mobile telephone or mobile electronic device that is the basis of the 
409 alleged violation was for emergency purposes. For the purpose of this section, an emergency 
410 shall mean that the junior operator used the hands-free mobile telephone or mobile electronic 
411 device to communicate with another to report any of the following: (i) that the motor vehicle was 
412 disabled; (ii) that medical attention or assistance was required; (iii) that police intervention, fire 
413 department or other emergency service was necessary for the personal safety of the operator or a 
414 passenger; or (iv) that a disabled vehicle or an accident was present in the public way. 
415  (2)A person convicted of this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
416 correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years or fined not less than $20 but not 
417 more than $200, or both. 
418  (3)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or 
419 magistrate recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
420  (a)First offense: 60 days 
421  (b)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 

22 of 69 422  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
423 operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
424 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 
425  (4)Upon a conviction of this subsection, if it appears by the records of the registrar that 
426 the person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor 
427 vehicle as a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of 
428 registration of any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
429  (5)Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $250 fee to the person. 
430 The court shall deposit $187.50 of the $250 collected under this assessment into the Head Injury 
431 Treatment Services Trust Fund. The remaining $62.50 shall be deposited into the General Fund. 
432 The assessment shall not be subject to reduction or waiver by the court for any reason. 
433  A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a violation 
434 of this section if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
435  Chapter 90, § 24B (7) – Cell phone by a person under 18 years of age use while operating 
436 causing injury to another person 
437  (1)No person under 18 years of age shall operate a motor vehicle while using a mobile 
438 phone or any other handheld device capable of accessing the internet, to manually compose, send 
439 or receive an electronic message on any public way negligently so that the lives or safety of the 
440 public might be endangered and proximately cause injury to any other person. 

23 of 69 441  For the purposes of this section, an operator shall not be considered to be operating a 
442 motor vehicle if the vehicle is stationary and not located in a part of a public way intended for 
443 travel. 
444  It shall be an affirmative defense for a junior operator to produce evidence that the use of 
445 a mobile telephone, hands-free mobile telephone or mobile electronic device that is the basis of 
446 the alleged violation was for emergency purposes. For the purpose of this section, an emergency 
447 shall mean that the junior operator used the hands-free mobile telephone or mobile electronic 
448 device to communicate with another to report any of the following: (i) that the motor vehicle was 
449 disabled; (ii) that medical attention or assistance was required; (iii) that police intervention, fire 
450 department or other emergency service was necessary for the personal safety of the operator or a 
451 passenger; or (iv) that a disabled vehicle or an accident was present in the public way. 
452  (2)A person convicted of this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
453 correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years or fined not less than $20 but not 
454 more than $200, or both. 
455  (3)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or 
456 magistrate recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
457  (a)First offense: 60 days 
458  (b)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 
459  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
460 operate provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
461 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate. 

24 of 69 462  (4)Upon a conviction of this subsection, if it appears by the records of the registrar that 
463 the person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor 
464 vehicle as a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of 
465 registration of any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
466  (5)Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $250 fee to the person. 
467 The court shall deposit $187.50 of the $250 collected under this assessment into the Head Injury 
468 Treatment Services Trust Fund. The remaining $62.50 shall be deposited into the General Fund. 
469 The assessment shall not be subject to reduction or waiver by the court for any reason. 
470  A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a violation 
471 of this section if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
472  Chapter 90, § 24C (1) - Leaving the scene after causing property damage 
473  (1)No person operating a motor vehicle on a public way shall knowingly collide with or 
474 otherwise cause injury to any other vehicle or property without stopping and making known his 
475 name, residence and the registration number of his motor vehicle. 
476  (2)A person convicted of this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
477 correction for not less than 2 weeks but not more than 2 years or fined not less than $20 but not 
478 more than $200, or both. 
479  (3)Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or 
480 magistrate recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
481  (a)First offense: 60 days 
482  (b)Subsequent offense within 3 years: 1 year 

25 of 69 483  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
484 operate provided; however, if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is found 
485 not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, for the 
486 purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the court finds 
487 that the charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol related charges 
488 pending in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a preponderance of 
489 the evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would endanger the public, there 
490 shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular suspension be terminated. 
491  (4)Upon a conviction of this section, if it appears by the records of the registrar that the 
492 person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor vehicle as 
493 a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of registration of 
494 any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
495  A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a violation 
496 of this subsection if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
497  Chapter 90, § 24C (2) - Leaving the scene after causing personal injury 
498  (1)No person operating a motor vehicle on a public way shall knowingly collide with or 
499 otherwise cause injury to any person, not resulting in the death of that person, without stopping 
500 and making known his name, residence and the registration number of his motor vehicle. 
501  (2)A person convicted of this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
502 correction for not less than 6 months but not more than 2 years and fined not less than $500 but 
503 not more than $1,000. No case commenced under this subsection shall be continued without a 
504 finding or placed on file. 

26 of 69 505  (3)Upon a conviction of this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or magistrate 
506 recommend otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
507  (a)First offense: 1 year 
508  (b)Subsequent offense: 2 years 
509  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
510 operate provided; however, if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is found 
511 not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, for the 
512 purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the court finds 
513 that the charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol related charges 
514 pending in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a preponderance of 
515 the evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would endanger the public, there 
516 shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular suspension be terminated. 
517  (4)Upon a conviction of this section, if it appears by the records of the registrar that the 
518 person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor vehicle as 
519 a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of registration of 
520 any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
521  Chapter 90, § 24C (3) - Leaving the scene after causing death 
522  (1) No person operating a motor vehicle on a public way shall knowingly collide with or 
523 otherwise cause injury to any person, resulting in death, without stopping and making known his 
524 name, residence and the registration number of his motor vehicle. 

27 of 69 525  (2)A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
526 correction for a minimum mandatory 1 year but not more than 2 ½ years or state prison for not 
527 less than 2 ½ but not more than 10 years with a minimum mandatory term of 1 year and fined not 
528 less than $1,000 but not more than $5,000. No case commenced under this subsection shall be 
529 continued without a finding or placed on file. 
530  (3)Upon a conviction of this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or magistrate 
531 recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
532  (a) First offense: 3 years 
533  (b)Subsequent offense: 10 years 
534  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
535 operate provided; however, if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is found 
536 not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, for the 
537 purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the court finds 
538 that the charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol related charges 
539 pending in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a preponderance of 
540 the evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would endanger the public, there 
541 shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular suspension be terminated. 
542  (4)Upon a conviction of this section, if it appears by the records of the registrar that the 
543 person convicted is the owner of a motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor vehicle as 
544 a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of registration of 
545 any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 

28 of 69 546  Chapter 90, § 24D- Operating under the influence of intoxicating liquor or other 
547 substances 
548  (1)No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public way while under the influence of 
549 intoxicating liquor, drugs, or other substances as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C. 
550  (2)A person convicted under subsection (1) of this section shall be punished as follows: 
551  First Offense: If there is no prior operating under the influence offense, the defendant 
552 shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for not more than 2 ½ years or fined not less 
553 than $500 but not more than $5,000, or both. 
554  Second Offense: If there is 1 prior operating under the influence offense, the defendant 
555 shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for a minimum mandatory term of 30 days but 
556 not more than 2 ½ years and fined not less than $600 but not more than $10,000. 
557  Third Offense: If there are 2 prior operating under the influence offenses, the defendant 
558 shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for not less than 150 days but not more than 2 
559 ½ years, or state prison for not less than 2 ½ years but not more than 5 years with a minimum 
560 mandatory term of 150 days and fined not less than $1,000 but not more than $15,000. 
561  Fourth Offense: If there are 3 prior operating under the influence offenses, the defendant 
562 shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for not less than 2 years but not more than 2 ½ 
563 years, or state prison for not less than 2 ½ years but not more than 5 years with a minimum 
564 mandatory term of 1 year and fined not less than $1,500 but not more than $25,000. 
565  Fifth or Subsequent Offense: If there are 4 or more prior operating under the influence 
566 offenses, the defendant shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for not less than 2 ½ 

29 of 69 567 years, or be imprisoned in the state prison for not less than 2 ½ years but not more than 5 years 
568 with a minimum mandatory term of 2 years and fined not less than $2,000 but not more than 
569 $50,000. 
570  Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $250 fee to the person. The 
571 court shall transmit $187.50 of the $250 collected under this assessment to the state treasurer to 
572 be deposited into the Head Injury Treatment Services Trust Fund. The remaining $62.50 shall be 
573 deposited into the General Fund. The assessment shall not be subject to reduction or waiver by 
574 the court for any reason. 
575  Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $50 fee to the person. The 
576 court shall transmit the $50 to the state treasurer to be deposited into the Victims of Drunk 
577 Driving Trust Fund. The assessment shall not be subject to waiver by the court for any reason. If 
578 the court sentences the person to a correctional facility the outstanding assessment shall be noted 
579 on the mittimus. 
580  In any prosecution commenced pursuant to this section, introduction into evidence of a 
581 prior conviction or a prior finding of sufficient facts by either certified attested copies of original 
582 court papers, or certified attested copies of the defendant’s biographical and informational data 
583 from records of the department of probation, any jail or house of correction, the department of 
584 correction, or the registry of motor vehicles, shall be prima facie evidence that the defendant 
585 before the court has been convicted previously or assigned to an alcohol or controlled substance 
586 education, treatment, or rehabilitation program by a court of the commonwealth or of a like 
587 offense from any other jurisdiction. Such documentation shall be self-authenticating and 
588 admissible, after the commonwealth has established the defendant’s guilt on the primary offense, 

30 of 69 589 as evidence in any court of the commonwealth to prove the defendant’s commission of any prior 
590 convictions or assignments to alcohol or controlled substance education, treatment, or 
591 rehabilitation programs described therein. The commonwealth shall not be required to introduce 
592 any additional corroborative evidence, nor live witness testimony to establish the validity of such 
593 prior offenses. 
594  No prosecutions under this section shall be continued without a finding except for cases 
595 disposed of pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (a) of subsection (3) of this section. No 
596 prosecutions under this section shall be placed on file, or subject to the provisions of section 87 
597 of chapter 276. At any time before the commencement of a trial or acceptance of a plea on a 
598 complaint alleging a violation of this section, the prosecutor may apply for the issuance of a new 
599 complaint pursuant to section 35A of chapter 218 alleging a violation of this section and 1 or 
600 more prior operating under the influence offenses. If such application is made, upon motion of 
601 the prosecutor, the court shall stay further proceedings on the original complaint pending the 
602 determination of the application for the new complaint. If a new complaint is issued, the court 
603 shall dismiss the original complaint and order that further proceedings on the new complaint be 
604 postponed until the defendant has had sufficient time to prepare a defense. No trial shall be 
605 commenced on a complaint alleging a violation of this subparagraph, nor shall any plea be 
606 accepted on such complaint, nor shall the prosecution on such complaint be transferred to 
607 another division of the district court or to a jury-of-six session, until the court receives a report 
608 from the commissioner of probation pertaining to the defendant’s record, if any, of prior 
609 operating under the influence offenses; provided, however, that the provisions of this paragraph 
610 shall not justify the postponement of any such trial or of the acceptance of any such plea for 
611 more than five working days after the date of the defendant’s arraignment. The commissioner of 

31 of 69 612 probation shall give priority to requests for such records. Upon any conviction or continuation 
613 without a finding under this section, the court shall order that any license issued by the 
614 commonwealth be surrendered to the probation department, and disposed of in a manner 
615 prescribed by the registrar. The clerk of courts shall notify the registrar forthwith of the 
616 disposition. 
617  Upon a disposition for an operating under the influence offense as defined in section (1) 
618 of this chapter the probation department, in the court in which the finding was entered, shall 
619 provide the defendant a copy of the statutory provisions that apply to any further operating under 
620 the influence offense. The statement of statutory provisions shall be prepared by the secretary of 
621 public safety. 
622  Upon a disposition for an operating under the influence offense as defined in section (1) 
623 of this chapter the court shall ask the defendant whether he was served alcohol prior to his 
624 violation at an establishment licensed to serve alcohol. If the defendant answers in the 
625 affirmative, the defendant shall provide the name and address of the establishment. The clerk’s 
626 office shall provide in writing to the Alcohol Beverage Control Commission the name of the 
627 establishment and date of offense given by the defendant. The Alcohol Beverage Control 
628 Commission shall inform the named establishment of this incident forthwith. The trial court 
629 shall, in conjunction with the Alcohol Beverage Control Commission, promulgate a standard 
630 form for reporting and collecting said information. The Alcohol Beverage Control Commission 
631 shall provide an annual report including the collected data to the attorney general, each district 
632 attorney, and the local liquor licensing authorities. 

32 of 69 633  The provisions of section 6A of chapter 279 shall not apply to a person with a prior 
634 operating under the influence offense as defined in section 1 of chapter 90. 
635  If a defendant waives his right to a jury trial pursuant to section 26A of chapter 218 on a 
636 complaint under this section he shall be deemed to have waived his right to a jury trial on all 
637 elements of the complaint. 
638  (3)Alternative Dispositions 
639  First Offense: If there is no evidence of a prior operating under the influence offense, a 
640 person charged or convicted may consent to being placed on probation for not more than 2 years 
641 instead of the disposition specified in subdivision (a) of subsection (2) of this section. Offenders 
642 with a single prior operating under the influence offense more than 10 years preceding the date 
643 of the most recent offense shall be eligible for a disposition under this subdivision. As a 
644 condition of this probation, the person shall be ordered to complete an out patient alcohol, drug, 
645 or substance abuse program as specified by the court. Offenders who reside out of state, or are a 
646 full time student out of state, may at the court’s discretion complete a licensed first offender’s 
647 program in that other state, as approved by the Department of Public Health. 
648  If a person is sentenced to an alternative disposition, notwithstanding the provisions of 
649 subsection (5) of this section, the court shall impose a suspension of the defendant’s license or 
650 right to operate for not less than 45 days nor more than 90 days if said person was over the age of 
651 21 at the time of the offense, or 210 days if said person was under the age of 21 at the time of 
652 offense. A person may immediately apply for a hardship license following disposition and 
653 enrollment into the treatment program required by this subsection. In all cases where a hardship 
654 license is sought, the probation office where the offender is or was on probation will, upon 

33 of 69 655 request, furnish the registrar with documentation verifying the person’s status with probation. 
656 Hardship licenses under this subsection shall be issued under such terms and conditions as the 
657 registrar may prescribe, after the registry is convinced that the issues that this offense(s) arose 
658 from have been dealt with by the operator and brought under control. Said hardship license shall 
659 be issued, subject to the agency’s discretion, upon a showing of hardship for work, education, or 
660 other purpose the registrar deems valid and significant, and shall be for an identical 12 hour 
661 period, 7 days a week. In all such cases where the defendant operated a motor vehicle with a 
662 percentage, by weight, of alcohol in their blood of fifteen one-hundredths or greater, the registrar 
663 may place a restriction on a hardship license granted by the registrar under this section requiring 
664 that such person have an ignition interlock device installed on each vehicle owned, each vehicle 
665 leased and each vehicle operated by the licensee for the duration of the hardship license.  
666 Notwithstanding the above, if the records of the registrar contain additional information 
667 regarding operating under the influence offenses, the registrar shall suspend the license in 
668 accordance with subsection (5) of this section. A person shall be presumed to be a suitable 
669 candidate for this disposition after trial unless otherwise prohibited by this section. In cases 
670 where an eligible person is not granted such a disposition should he or she seek it, the court shall 
671 make written findings supporting its decision. 
672  Each person placed in such a program shall pay a program fee as determined by the 
673 department of public health. The program fee shall not exceed the cost per client to run the 
674 program. The department of public health shall compile a schedule of uniform fees for these 
675 programs, which shall be changed only after notice and public hearing. The department shall 
676 promulgate rules and regulations regarding the process and methodology of setting these fees. 
677 No person shall be denied entry into a program where the court, after review and investigation by 

34 of 69 678 the probation department, determines that the defendant is indigent, and has filed such an 
679 affidavit with the court. The court may then waive or reduce said fee on a case by case basis. 
680 Subject to appropriation, the department of public health shall reimburse each program for the 
681 costs of services provided to persons for whom payment of a fee has been waived or reduced on 
682 the grounds of indigency. 
683  In addition to the program fee, the court shall assess a $250 fee to each person placed in 
684 such a program. The court shall transmit the $250 to the state treasurer for the support of 
685 programs operated by the commissioner of public health for the investigation, enforcement, 
686 treatment and rehabilitation of persons charged with or convicted of operating under the 
687 influence. The assessment may be reduced or waived if the court makes written findings that 
688 payment would cause the person severe financial hardship. 
689  The alternative disposition programs utilized under this subsection shall be established, 
690 administered or approved by the department of public health, who shall have authority to 
691 promulgate such regulations as is necessary to govern the content, conduct, operation or approval 
692 of these programs. The department of public health shall prepare and publish annually a list of all 
693 accepted alcohol treatment and rehabilitation programs, make this list available upon request to 
694 members of the public, and annually furnish the commissioner of probation, the registrar, and the 
695 secretary of public safety with a copy of said list. 
696  The commissioner of probation shall annually report to the department of public health 
697 the number of persons who receive an alternative disposition and the number of persons who 
698 have been required by the court to participate in alcohol or controlled substance abuse treatment 
699 or rehabilitation programs. In addition, the commissioner of probation, and the chief justice of 

35 of 69 700 the district courts and the Boston Municipal Court shall annually report to the department of 
701 public health the resources available for alcohol and controlled substance abuse treatment and 
702 rehabilitation of alcohol-impaired or controlled substance abuse-impaired drivers. The report 
703 shall evaluate the existing resources and shall make recommendations as to any additional 
704 resources. The department of public health shall take such reports into consideration in the 
705 development, implementation, and review of the state’s alcoholism or controlled substance abuse 
706 plan and in the preparation of the division’s annual budget in a manner consistent with the 
707 Alcoholism Treatment and Rehabilitation Law. 
708  Second Offense: Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, in cases 
709 where a defendant has only one prior operating under the influence offense, the court, in its 
710 discretion, may order the defendant to enter and complete a 14 day in patient program and to 
711 participate in an outpatient counseling program designed for such offenders in lieu of the 
712 required 30 day minimum mandatory term. This program shall be in addition to any probation 
713 ordered under section 24D(2)(b). 
714  The defendant shall pay for the cost of the services provided by the residential alcohol 
715 treatment program; provided, however, that no person shall be excluded from said programs for 
716 inability to pay; and provided, further, that such person files with the court, an affidavit of 
717 indigency or inability to pay and that investigation by the probation officer confirms such 
718 indigency or establishes that payment of such fee would cause a grave and serious hardship to 
719 such individual or to the family of such individual, and that the court enters a written finding 
720 thereof. In lieu of waiver of the entire amount of said fee, the court may direct such individual to 
721 make partial or installment payments of the cost of said program. 

36 of 69 722  The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any person who causes serious bodily 
723 injury or death to another person during the events that gave rise to the complaint or indictment. 
724  (4)The following persons shall complete an alcohol and drug assessment conducted by 
725 the department of public health or other court approved program as a mandatory condition of any 
726 sentence imposed: 
727  A person having a percentage, by weight, of alcohol in his blood of .20% or above during 
728 an operating under the influence offense; or 
729  A person with a second or subsequent operating under the influence offense. 
730  The assessment shall include at a minimum an evaluation of the level of the offender’s 
731 addiction to alcohol and/or drugs and the department’s recommended course of treatment. Such 
732 assessment and recommendation shall be reported to the offender’s probation or parole officer. 
733 No person shall be excluded from an assessment for inability to pay if the offender files an 
734 affidavit of indigency or inability to pay with the court and an investigation by the probation or 
735 parole officer confirms such indigency or establishes that such payment would cause a grave and 
736 serious hardship to the offender or his family, and the court enters written findings relative 
737 thereto. The commissioner of public health may make such rules and regulations as are necessary 
738 or proper to carry out this section. 
739  (5)Upon conviction the registrar shall suspend the license or right to operate, based on the 
740 number of offenses on the agency’s records, as follows: 

37 of 69 741  First offense: 1 year except for persons that have properly received dispositions pursuant 
742 to subsection 3 of section 24D of this chapter. The operator may apply for a hardship license 90 
743 days from the date of conviction, absent any other suspensions. 
744  Second offense: 2 years except for persons that have properly received dispositions 
745 pursuant to subsection 3 of section 24D of this chapter. The operator may apply for a hardship 
746 license 1 year from the date of conviction, absent any other suspensions. 
747  Third offense: 8 years. The operator may apply for a hardship license 2 years from the 
748 date of conviction, absent any other suspensions. 
749  Fourth offense: 10 years. The operator may apply for a hardship license 5 years from the 
750 date of conviction, absent any other suspensions. 
751  Fifth or subsequent offense: Lifetime. 
752  Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) through (e) of this subsection, the registrar shall 
753 suspend for life a person’s license or right to operate upon an operating under the influence 
754 offense if the person has been previously convicted of motor vehicle homicide while under the 
755 influence or manslaughter by motor vehicle. 
756  Hardship licenses under this subsection shall be issued under such terms and conditions 
757 as the registrar may prescribe, after the registry is convinced that the issues that this offense(s) 
758 arose from have been dealt with by the operator and brought under control. Said hardship license 
759 shall be issued, subject to the agency’s discretion, upon a showing of hardship for work, 
760 education, or other purpose the registrar deems valid and significant, and shall be for an identical 
761 12 hour period, 7 days a week. 

38 of 69 762  If there are 2 prior operating under the influence offenses, the registrar may suspend the 
763 registration of a motor vehicle owned by a person for the duration of the suspension of the 
764 license or right to operate. No new registration shall be issued to said person during the 
765 suspension period. 
766  Chapter 90, § 24E – Implied Consent 
767  (1)Whoever operates a motor vehicle on a public way shall be deemed to have consented 
768 to a test of his breath or blood in the event he is arrested with operating a motor vehicle while 
769 under the influence of intoxicating liquor. A person brought to a police station or place of 
770 detention is deemed to have consented to a test of his breath. A valid breath test under this 
771 section shall be one adequate breath sample analysis, followed by one calibration standard 
772 analysis, and then by a second adequate breath sample analysis. A person is deemed to have 
773 consented to a test of his blood only if he has been brought to a medical facility licensed pursuant 
774 to the provisions of section 51 of chapter 111, and the blood is drawn by a physician, registered 
775 nurse or certified medical technician; provided further that no person inflicted with hemophilia 
776 or any other condition requiring the use of anticoagulants shall be deemed to have consented to 
777 the withdrawal of blood. Such test shall be administered by or at the direction of a police officer 
778 as defined in section 1 of chapter 90C, having reasonable grounds to believe that the defendant 
779 was operating under the influence. 
780  In any prosecution for an operating under the influence offense, evidence of a defendant's 
781 blood alcohol content at the time of offense, shown by breath or blood, is relevant and admissible 
782 to determine whether the defendant was under the influence of intoxicating liquor as defined in 
783 section 1 of this chapter, if test was conducted by or at the direction of a police officer, with the 

39 of 69 784 consent of the defendant. Upon the defendant’s request the results of said test shall be made 
785 available to him. In any case where a test is given, the defendant shall have the right to have 
786 another test done at his own expense, by a physician of his choosing. 
787  Evidence that the defendant refused such test shall not be admissible in a criminal or civil 
788 proceeding, but shall be admissible in any action by the registrar in any proceeding provided for 
789 in under this section. For purposes of this section, a refusal is either a verbal or written refusal to 
790 take a test, or a failure to consent to a test required by this section. 
791  If such evidence is that the blood alcohol content was .05% or less, there shall be a 
792 permissible inference that the defendant was not under the influence of intoxicating liquor, and 
793 he shall be released from custody forthwith, absent any other arrestable charges. The officer(s) 
794 who placed the defendant in custody shall not be liable for false arrest if there were reasonable 
795 grounds to believe that he was operating under the influence. 
796  If the evidence is that such blood alcohol content was more than .05% but less than .08%, 
797 there shall be no permissible inference. 
798  If the evidence is that such blood alcohol content was .08% or more, the defendant is 
799 deemed to be under the influence as defined in section 1 of this chapter. 
800  A certificate, signed and sworn to, by a chemist of the department of the state police or a 
801 laboratory certified by the department of public health, which contains the results of an analysis 
802 made by such chemist of the blood alcohol content shall be prima facie evidence. 
803  (2)Upon any refusal by the person arrested of a test required by this section, after the 
804 person has been informed that his license or right to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended 

40 of 69 805 for the refusal, the registrar shall immediately suspend the person’s license or right to operate as 
806 follows: 
807  If the person was age 21 or over at the time of offense, and has no prior operating under 
808 the influence convictions or been assigned to a program for, the suspension shall be for 180 days. 
809  If the person has 1 prior operating under the influence conviction, or was under age 21 at 
810 the time of offense and has no more than 1 prior operating under the influence conviction, the 
811 suspension shall be for 3 years. 
812  If the person has 2 prior operating under the influence convictions, the suspension shall 
813 be for 5 years. 
814  If the person has 3 or more prior operating under the influence convictions, the 
815 suspension shall be for life. 
816  If the person has a prior conviction under sections 24L or 24J of this chapter, the 
817 suspension shall be for 10 years. 
818  If the person has a prior operating under the influence conviction pursuant to section 24K 
819 of this chapter or a conviction under section 24L of this chapter the suspension shall be for life. 
820  No hardship licenses on suspensions for test refusals shall be granted, except for 
821 candidates that have properly received dispositions pursuant to subsection 3 of section 24D of 
822 this chapter. Any suspensions under this section shall be consecutive with any suspension or 
823 suspension for the underlying operation under the influence offense. Notwithstanding that, if the 
824 charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is found not guilty, the person may 
825 immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, for the purpose of seeking 

41 of 69 826 restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the court finds that the charges 
827 were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol related charges pending in any 
828 court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a preponderance of the evidence 
829 that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would endanger the public, there shall be a 
830 presumption that the court shall order that this particular suspension be terminated. 
831  Any person refusing a test under this section shall have a right, at his request, to a hearing 
832 before the registrar to determine if grounds exist for the suspension. Any hearing request shall be 
833 made within 15 days of the incident giving rise to this suspension. The hearing shall be limited to 
834 the issues of whether reasonable grounds exist for the officer’s belief that the person placed 
835 under arrest was operating under the influence on a public way at the time of the incident, 
836 whether the person was advised of the consequences of the refusal, and did the person refuse or 
837 fail to consent to such test. The registrar shall compile a record of the hearing. If the ruling is in 
838 the person’s favor, absent any other reason for suspension, the registrar shall restore the person’s 
839 license or right to operate. The registrar may promulgate such rules and regulations as is 
840 necessary regarding the conduct of these hearings. 
841  If the registrar rules that the suspension for refusal was proper, the appellant may file a 
842 petition for judicial review in the district court having jurisdiction over the underlying operation 
843 under the influence charge within 30 days of the registrar’s decision. Review by the court shall 
844 be on the record established at the hearing before the registrar. If the court finds that the 
845 department exceeded its constitutional or statutory authority, made an erroneous interpretation of 
846 the law, acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner, or made a determination which is 
847 unsupported by the evidence in the record, the court may reverse the registrar’s determination. 

42 of 69 848  If a test indicates that a person was operating with a blood alcohol content of .08% or 
849 above, the registrar shall immediately suspend the person’s license or right to operate for 30 
850 days, or until the conclusion of the court case, whichever is shorter. 
851  A person whose license or right to operate is suspended under this subsection may appeal 
852 the suspension within 10 days of the arraignment to the court where the charges are pending. The 
853 appeal shall be limited to the issues of whether a blood test, taken within a reasonable period of 
854 time after the arrest, shows a result of less than .08%, or that the test results were not consistent 
855 with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. 
856  If the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is found not guilty, the 
857 person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, for the purpose of 
858 seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the court finds that the 
859 charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol related charges pending 
860 in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a preponderance of the 
861 evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would endanger the public, there 
862 shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular suspension be terminated. 
863  (3)Chemical analysis of the breath of a person charged with a violation of this chapter 
864 shall not be considered valid under the provisions of this chapter, unless such analysis has been 
865 performed by a certified operator, using infrared breath-testing devices according to methods 
866 approved by the secretary of public safety. The secretary of public safety shall promulgate rules 
867 and regulations regarding satisfactory methods, techniques and criteria for the conduct of such 
868 tests, and shall establish a statewide training and certification program for all operators of such 

43 of 69 869 devices and a periodic certification program for such breath testing devices; provided, however, 
870 that the secretary may terminate or suspend such certification at his discretion. 
871  Said regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to the following: 
872  The chemical analysis of the breath of a person charged be performed by a certified 
873 operator using a certified infrared breath-testing device in the following sequence: 
874  (1) one adequate breath sample analysis 
875  (2) one calibration standard analysis 
876  (3) a second adequate breath sample analysis 
877  No person shall perform such a test unless certified by the secretary of public safety 
878  No breath testing device, mouthpiece or tube shall be cleaned with any substance 
879 containing alcohol. 
880  The secretary of public safety shall prescribe uniform formats, electronic or otherwise, 
881 for reports of such chemical analysis to be used by law enforcement officers and others acting in 
882 accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The reports generated in these formats shall be 
883 sequentially numbered. Each chief of police or other officer or official having charge or control 
884 of a law enforcement agency shall be responsible for the proper availability of these formats. 
885 Each party so responsible shall prepare or cause to be prepared such records and reports relating 
886 to such uniform formats and their disposition in such manner and at such times as the secretary 
887 of public safety shall prescribe. 

44 of 69 888  Upon any failed or refused test under this section the police shall confiscate any license 
889 or permit issued by the commonwealth in the possession of the defendant, serve the defendant 
890 with a notice of suspension on behalf of the registrar, and impound the operator’s vehicle for a 
891 12 hour period following the incident. The operator shall be responsible for all costs associated 
892 with towing, storage and maintenance of the vehicle. In addition, in each case, the police shall 
893 prepare a report to the registrar under the pains and penalties of perjury, indicating the following: 
894  a)the grounds the arresting officer had to believe that the defendant was operating under 
895 the influence on a public way; 
896  b)the defendant was advised of the consequences of refusing the test; 
897  c)the results of any failed test; 
898  d)whether or not the operator refused or failed to consent to the test; 
899  e)the identity of the officer who advised the defendant of his rights; 
900  f)the identity and certification of the officer who conducted the breath test; 
901  g)the identity of any witness to the test or refusal; 
902  h)that the test was administered in accordance with the regulations and standards 
903 promulgated by the secretary of safety; and 
904  i)There was every reason to believe the equipment was functioning properly at the time 
905 the test was administered. 

45 of 69 906  The reports specified in this subsection shall be reported to the registrar forthwith in order 
907 to expedite the suspension of the license or right to operate, and shall be admissible as prima 
908 facie evidence in any administrative action before the registrar. 
909  If a test is an analysis of blood rather than breath, in cases where a test indicates a blood 
910 alcohol content of .08% or above, or .02% or above if the operator is under age 21 at the time of 
911 offense, the police shall report said result to the registrar, who shall suspend the license 
912 consistent with the provisions of this section. 
913  (4)Notwithstanding the findings of any charge, the following additional provisions shall 
914 apply to persons under age 21 after having been arrested for an operating under the influence 
915 offense: 
916  Upon evidence that a person under the age of 21 had a blood alcohol content of .02% or 
917 above or refused to submit to a chemical test or analysis of his breath or blood under this section, 
918 shall have his license or right to operate a motor vehicle suspended by the registrar for a period 
919 of an additional 180 days. Any person who is less than 18 years of age at the time of such 
920 offense shall have his license suspended by the registrar for an additional 1 year. 
921  If a person has not been previously arrested for or charged with operating under the 
922 influence, such person shall, if he consents, be assigned to a program specifically designed by the 
923 department of public health for the treatment of underage drinking drivers. Upon entry into a 
924 program, authorized by this subsection, or a program required by section 24D of this chapter, the 
925 suspension of a license or right to operate as required by this subsection shall be waived by the 
926 registrar for a person under 21 years of age and over 18 years of age. The suspension shall be 
927 reduced to 180 days for a person who was under the age of 18 at the time of such offense. Upon 

46 of 69 928 the failure of a person who, at the time of offense was under the age of 21, to successfully 
929 complete such program, the registrar shall forthwith suspend such license or permit to operate for 
930 180 days, or for 1 year if the person was under age 18 at the time of offense. 
931  The license, permit, or right to operate of a person convicted of any violation under 
932 section 24, 24A, 24B, 24C, 24I or 24J of this chapter, who was under the age of 18 at the time of 
933 such violation and whose license or permit to operate was not already suspended under this 
934 section for failing or refusing a test, shall have such license or right to operate suspended for an 
935 additional period of 180 days for a first offense and for a period of 1 year for a second or 
936 subsequent offense. 
937  (5)When a complaint is issued alleging a person has violated section 24D, 24J, or 24K of 
938 this chapter, or violated section 8(1) (a), 8A, or 8B of chapter 90B, upon the failure of a police 
939 officer to suspend or take custody of the defendant’s license or permit, the judge shall 
940 immediately suspend and take custody of the defendant’s license or right to operate in the 
941 following instances: 
942  (a)If the prosecutor makes a prima facie showing at arraignment that the defendant was 
943 operating a motor vehicle with a blood alcohol content of .08 or greater, or if the defendant is 
944 under 21 years of age a blood alcohol content of .02 or greater, as shown by a test of his breath 
945 or blood; and the prosecutor presents written certification of oral testimony from the person who 
946 administered the test that: 
947  (1)the defendant was given a test; 
948  (2)the person administering the test was trained and certified in the administration of the 
949 test; 

47 of 69 950  (3)the test was performed in accordance with regulations and standards promulgated by 
951 the secretary of public safety; 
952  (4)the equipment used for the test was regularly serviced and maintained; and 
953  (5)the person administering the test had every reason to believe the equipment was 
954 functioning properly at the time the test was administered. 
955  The written certification shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein. 
956  Upon a showing of the above facts, the judge shall take immediate physical possession of 
957 the license or permit and shall direct the prosecuting officer to immediately notify the 
958 Department of Criminal Justice Information Systems and the registrar of such suspension. The 
959 defendant’s license or right to operate shall be suspended for a period not to exceed 30 days; or 
960  (b)If the prosecutor makes a prima facie showing at arraignment that the defendant was 
961 arrested for operating on any such way or place while under the influence of intoxicating liquor 
962 and refused a test of his breath or blood, the judge shall take immediate physical possession of 
963 the license or permit and shall direct the prosecuting officer to immediately notify the 
964 Department of Criminal Justice Information Systems and the registrar of such suspension. The 
965 defendant’s license or right to operate shall be suspended as follows: 
966  If the person was age 21 or over at the time of offense, and has no prior operating under 
967 the influence offenses, the suspension shall be for 180 days. 
968  If the person has one prior operating under the influence offense, or was under the age of 
969 21 at the time of offense and has no more than 1 prior operating under the influence offenses, the 
970 suspension shall be for 1 year. 

48 of 69 971  If the person has 2 prior operating under the influence offenses, the suspension shall be 
972 for 18 months. 
973  No license shall be restored under any circumstances and no restricted or hardship 
974 permits shall be issued during the suspension period imposed by this paragraph. If the charges 
975 against the person are dismissed, or the person is found not guilty, the person may immediately 
976 file a motion before the judge that heard the case, for the purpose of seeking restoration of the 
977 license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the court finds that the charges were resolved in 
978 favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol related charges pending in any court, and that 
979 there is no evidence before the court based on a preponderance of the evidence that reinstatement 
980 of the license or right to operate would endanger the public, there shall be a presumption that the 
981 court shall order that this particular suspension be terminated. 
982  Any person whose license or right to operate has been suspended under this section shall 
983 have a right, at his request, to a hearing before the registrar to determine if grounds exist for the 
984 suspension. Any hearing request shall be made within 10 days of the incident giving rise to this 
985 suspension. The hearing shall be limited to the issues of whether or not a blood test administered 
986 pursuant to section 24E of this chapter, within a reasonable period of time after a test of his 
987 breath, shows that that the blood alcohol content was less than .08% or less than .02% if the 
988 person was under the age of 21 at the time of the offense. 
989  If, after a hearing, the court finds the defendant’s blood alcohol content was less than 
990 .08% or less than .02% if the person was under the age of 21 at the time of offense, the court 
991 shall restore the defendant’s license or right to operate and shall direct the prosecuting officer to 

49 of 69 992 immediately notify the Department of Criminal Justice Information Systems and the registrar of 
993 such restoration. 
994  (6)Any person whose license or right to operate has been suspended because the person 
995 refused to submit to a test of his breath or blood under this section shall have the right, at his 
996 request, to a hearing before the court in which the underlying charges are pending to determine if 
997 grounds exist for the suspension. Any hearing request shall be made within 10 days of the 
998 hearing giving rise to this suspension. The hearing shall be limited to the following issues: 
999  (a)whether or not the police officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person had 
1000 been operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor on a public way; 
1001  (b)whether or not the person was placed under arrest; and 
1002  (c)whether or not the person refused to submit to a test of his breath or blood. 
1003  If, after a hearing, the court finds in the negative on any one of the issues, the court shall 
1004 restore the defendant’s license or right to operate and shall direct the prosecuting officer to 
1005 immediately notify the Department of Criminal Justice Information Systems and the registrar of 
1006 such restoration. 
1007  Chapter 90, § 24F – Ignition Interlock Devices 
1008  (1)Any person whose license or right to operate is suspended for 2 or more operating 
1009 under the influence offenses, or who is operating on a restricted license for such offenses, shall 
1010 be required to have an ignition interlock device installed on each vehicle that he may own, lease, 
1011 or operate as a mandatory condition of issuance of a new license or right to operate. The 
1012 restriction shall remain on the license during the hardship license period and an additional 2 

50 of 69 1013 years upon the full restoration of the license. In cases where the person has not been granted a 
1014 hardship license, the ignition interlock requirement shall be for a 2 year period following the 
1015 reinstatement of the license or right to operate. 
1016  Each device shall be subject to inspection, maintenance, and monitoring as the registrar 
1017 may prescribe. No ignition interlock device utilized under this section shall allow a vehicle to 
1018 start if a person’s blood alcohol content exceeds .02%. The registrar shall promulgate such rules 
1019 and regulations as deemed necessary regarding this section. 
1020  The registrar may, after hearing, suspend the license or right to operate of any person 
1021 who: 
1022  (a)removes an ignition interlock device without the written consent of the registrar; or 
1023  (b)who fails to have it inspected, maintained or monitored on at least 2 occasions during 
1024 the requirement period, 
1025  if the licensee has: 
1026  (a)operated a vehicle with a blood alcohol content that caused the certified ignition 
1027 interlock device to prevent the vehicle from starting on at least 2 occasions; or 
1028  (b)recorded a blood alcohol content in excess of .02% on at least 2 occasions. 
1029  (c) In all such cases where the defendant operated a motor vehicle with a percentage, by 
1030 weight, of alcohol in their blood of fifteen one-hundredths or greater, the registrar may place a 
1031 restriction on a hardship license granted by the registrar under this subparagraph requiring that 
1032 such person have an ignition interlock device installed on each vehicle owned, each vehicle 
1033 leased and each vehicle operated by the licensee for the duration of the hardship license. 

51 of 69 1034  The suspension shall be for an extended period or for life. A person aggrieved by the 
1035 decision of the registrar pursuant to this section may file an appeal in the superior court. If the 
1036 court determines that the registrar abused his discretion, the court may vacate the suspension or 
1037 reduce the period ordered by the registrar. 
1038  (2)No person required to have an ignition interlock device shall operate a motor vehicle 
1039 without such a device on a public way. 
1040  A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
1041 correction for not less than 150 days but not more than 2 ½ years, or the state prison for not less 
1042 than 2 ½ years but not more than 5 years with a minimum mandatory term of 150 days. A fine of 
1043 not less than $1,000 but not more than $15,000 shall be imposed. 
1044  (3)No person shall interfere with or tamper with an ignition interlock device with the 
1045 intent to disable such device. 
1046  A person convicted under this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment in a jail or 
1047 house of correction for not less than 6 months but not more than 2 ½ years, or state prison for not 
1048 less than 3 years but not more than 5 years. 
1049  (4)No person shall knowingly breathe into an ignition interlock device, or start a motor 
1050 vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device, for the purpose of providing an operable 
1051 motor vehicle to a person under a license restriction requiring an ignition interlock device. 
1052  A person convicted under this subsection shall be punished as follows: 

52 of 69 1053  (a)First offense: The defendant shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for not 
1054 less than 6 months but not more than 2 ½ years or punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 but 
1055 not more than $5,000. 
1056  (b)Second or subsequent offense: The defendant shall be imprisoned in state prison for 
1057 not less than 3 years but not more than 5 years. 
1058  (5)A certified copy of a signed acknowledgement of the terms and existence of an 
1059 ignition interlock device restriction, executed by a person alleged to have violated this section, 
1060 shall be admissible as prima facie evidence to prove the knowledge of the person who executed 
1061 the document. 
1062  Chapter 90, § 24G – Motor Vehicle Forfeitures 
1063  (1)A motor vehicle or vessel owned by a person who has at least 3 prior operating under 
1064 the influence offenses, as defined in section 1 of chapter 90, may be forfeited to the 
1065 commonwealth. 
1066  (2)A district attorney or the attorney general may petition the superior or district court, in 
1067 the name of the commonwealth in the nature of a proceeding in rem to order forfeiture of such 
1068 motor vehicle or vessel. The petition shall be filed in the court having jurisdiction over the 
1069 criminal proceeding brought under this chapter or chapter 90B. The proceeding shall be deemed 
1070 a civil suit in equity. In all such actions where the motor vehicle or vessel is jointly owned by 
1071 either a parent, spouse, child, grandparent, brother, sister, or parent of the spouse living in the 
1072 defendant's household, before the date of the second or subsequent operating under the influence 
1073 offense committed by the defendant, the commonwealth shall have the burden of proving the 
1074 existence of probable cause to institute the action. The claimant shall have the burden of proving 

53 of 69 1075 that the property is not forfeitable because the claimant is dependent on the motor vehicle or 
1076 vessel for his livelihood or the maintenance of his family. 
1077  The court shall order the commonwealth to give notice, by certified or registered mail, to 
1078 the owners of the motor vehicle or vessel and, to such other persons or entities who appear to 
1079 have an interest therein. The court shall promptly, but not less than 2 weeks after notice, hold a 
1080 hearing on the petition. Upon the motion of an owner of the motor vehicle or vessel, the court 
1081 may continue the hearing on the petition pending the outcome of a criminal trial related to a 
1082 charge of operating under the influence in violation of this chapter or chapter 90B. During the 
1083 pendency of the proceedings, the court may issue, at the request of the commonwealth, ex parte, 
1084 any preliminary order or process necessary to seize and secure the property for which forfeiture 
1085 is sought. Process for seizure of the property shall issue only upon a showing of probable cause. 
1086 The application, issuance, execution, and return thereof shall be subject to the provisions of 
1087 chapter 276, as applicable. 
1088  (3)At a hearing under this section, the court shall hear evidence and make findings of fact 
1089 and conclusions of law, and shall issue a final order. The parties shall have a right of appeal as 
1090 from a decree in equity. No forfeiture under this section shall extinguish a perfected security 
1091 interest held by a creditor in the property at the time of the filing of the forfeiture action. In all 
1092 actions where a proceeding results in forfeiture, the final order shall provide for disposition of 
1093 the property by the commonwealth in any manner not prohibited by law, including official use 
1094 by an authorized law enforcement or other agency, or at sale at public auction or by competitive 
1095 bidding, with such sale being conducted by the office of the district attorney or the attorney 
1096 general that obtained the final order of forfeiture. 

54 of 69 1097  (4)The final order of the court shall provide that the proceeds of any such sale shall be 
1098 used to pay the reasonable expenses of the forfeiture proceedings, seizure, storage, maintenance 
1099 of custody, advertising and notice, and the balance of any such sale shall be distributed equally 
1100 among the prosecuting district attorney or attorney general, the city, town or state police 
1101 department involved in the forfeiture and the Victims of Drunk Driving Trust Fund established in 
1102 section 66 of chapter 10. If more than 1 department was substantially involved in the seizure, the 
1103 court having jurisdiction over the forfeiture proceeding shall distribute the portion for law 
1104 enforcement equitably among the departments. 
1105  (5)There shall be established within the office of the state treasurer a separate Operating 
1106 Under the Influence Deterrent Trust Fund for each district attorney and for the attorney general. 
1107 All monies and proceeds received by a prosecuting district attorney or attorney general pursuant 
1108 to this section shall be deposited in the fund and shall be expended without further appropriation 
1109 to defray the costs of investigations, to provide additional technical equipment or expertise, to 
1110 provide matching funds to obtain federal grants, or for such other law enforcement purposes as 
1111 the district attorney or attorney general deems appropriate. Any program seeking to be an 
1112 eligible recipient of the funds shall file an annual audit report with the local district attorney and 
1113 attorney general. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, a listing of the assets, liabilities, 
1114 itemized expenditures and board of directors of the program. Within 90 days of the close of the 
1115 fiscal year, each district attorney and the attorney general shall file an annual report with the 
1116 house and senate committees on ways and means on the use of the monies in the trust fund for 
1117 the purposes of deterring operating under the influence programs. 
1118  (6)All moneys and proceeds received by a police department shall be deposited into the 
1119 fund and shall be expended without further appropriation to defray the costs of investigations, to 

55 of 69 1120 provide additional technical equipment or expertise, to provide matching funds to obtain federal 
1121 grants, or to accomplish such other law enforcement purposes as the chief of police of such city 
1122 or town, or the colonel of state police deem appropriate, but such funds shall not be considered a 
1123 source of revenue to meet the operating needs of such department. 
1124  Chapter 90, § 24H - Aggravated OUI 
1125  (1)Any person aged 17 to 21 years, inclusive, who commits an operating under the 
1126 influence offense, and who has a blood alcohol content of .20% or above, shall also be guilty of 
1127 aggravated operating under the influence, and in addition to the penalties mandated in section 
1128 24D of this chapter, shall also be required to enter and complete a 14 day residential treatment 
1129 program as described in subdivision (b) of subsection (3) of that section. In cases where the 
1130 person is otherwise qualified for a disposition under subdivision (a) of subsection (3), the person 
1131 shall be required to complete the 14 day residential program in lieu of the outpatient program 
1132 specified therein. 
1133  Chapter 90, § 24I - Child Endangerment 
1134  (1)No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public way while under the influence of 
1135 intoxicating liquor, drugs, or other substance with a child 14 years of age or younger in the 
1136 vehicle. 
1137  A person convicted under this section shall be punished as follows: 
1138  (a)First offense: The defendant shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of correction for not 
1139 less than 90 days but not more than 2 ½ years and fined not less than $1,000 but not more than 
1140 $5,000. 

56 of 69 1141  (b)Subsequent offense: If there is a prior conviction for a violation of this subsection or a 
1142 like offense in another jurisdiction the defendant shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
1143 correction for a minimum mandatory term of 6 months but not more than 2 ½ years, or state 
1144 prison for not less than 3 years but not more than 5 years with a minimum mandatory term of 6 
1145 months and fined not less than $5,000 but not more than $10,000. 
1146  Upon a conviction under this section the registrar shall suspend the license or right to 
1147 operate for an additional period as follows: 
1148  (a)First offense: 1 year 
1149  (b)Subsequent offense: 3 years 
1150  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
1151 operate. 
1152  A sentence imposed under this subsection shall be served consecutively to and not 
1153 concurrently with the underlying operating under the influence offense. No case commenced 
1154 under this section shall be continued without a finding, or placed on file, or subject to the 
1155 provisions of section 87 of chapter 276. 
1156  Chapter 90, § 24J - Operating under the influence causing serious bodily injury 
1157  (1)No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public way while under the influence of 
1158 intoxicating liquor, drugs, or other substances and by such operation cause serious bodily injury 
1159 to another person. 
1160  A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
1161 correction for not more than 2 ½ years or fined not more than $3,000, or both. 

57 of 69 1162  (2)No person shall operate a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating 
1163 liquor, drugs, or other substances on a public way negligently or recklessly so that the lives or 
1164 safety of the public might be endangered and by such operation cause serious bodily injury to 
1165 another person. 
1166  A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
1167 correction for a minimum mandatory term of 6 months but not more than 2 ½ years, or state 
1168 prison for not less than 2 ½ years but not more than 10 years with a minimum mandatory term of 
1169 6 months and fined not more than $5,000. No case commenced under this section shall be 
1170 continued without a finding, or placed on file, or subject to the provisions of section 87 of 
1171 chapter 276. 
1172  (3)Upon a conviction under this section the registrar shall suspend the license or right to 
1173 operate for 2 years after the date of conviction. No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the 
1174 suspension of the license or right to operate, provided; however, if the charges against the person 
1175 are dismissed, or the person is found not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before 
1176 the judge that heard the case, for the purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to 
1177 operate. At said hearing, if the court finds that the charges were resolved in favor of the 
1178 defendant, that there are no alcohol related charges pending in any court, and that there is no 
1179 evidence before the court based on a preponderance of the evidence that reinstatement of the 
1180 license or right to operate would endanger the public, there shall be a presumption that the court 
1181 shall order that this particular suspension be terminated. 
1182  (4)Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (3) above, if a person license or right to 
1183 operate for life. 

58 of 69 1184  (5)Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $50 fee to the person. 
1185 The court shall transmit the $50 to the state treasurer to be deposited into the Victims of Drunk 
1186 Driving Trust Fund. The assessment shall not be subject to waiver by the court for any reason. If 
1187 the court sentences the person to a correctional facility the outstanding assessment shall be noted 
1188 on the mittimus. 
1189  (6)For purposes of this section “serious bodily injury” shall mean bodily injury which 
1190 creates a substantial risk of death or involves either total disability or the loss or substantial 
1191 impairment of some bodily function for a substantial period of time. 
1192  Chapter 90, § 24K (1) – Misdemeanor motor vehicle homicide – negligently or recklessly 
1193  (1)No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public way negligently or recklessly so 
1194 that the lives or safety of the public might be endangered and by such operation cause the death 
1195 of another person. 
1196  A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
1197 correction for not less than 30 days but not more than 2 ½ years or fined not less than $300 but 
1198 not more than $3,000, or both. No case commenced under this subsection shall be continued 
1199 without a finding or placed on file. 
1200  Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall suspend the license or right to 
1201 operate as follows: 
1202  (a)First offense: 15 years after the date of conviction 
1203  (b)Subsequent offense: Lifetime 

59 of 69 1204  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
1205 operate, provided; however, if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is 
1206 found not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, 
1207 for the purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the 
1208 court finds that the charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol 
1209 related charges pending in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a 
1210 preponderance of the evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would 
1211 endanger the public, there shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular 
1212 suspension be terminated. 
1213  Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $50 fee to the person. The 
1214 court shall transmit the $50 to the state treasurer to be deposited into the Victim’s of Drunk 
1215 Driving Trust Fund. The assessment shall not be subjected to waiver by the court for any reason. 
1216 If the court sentences the person to a correctional facility the outstanding assessment shall be 
1217 noted on the mittimus. 
1218  Chapter 90, § 24K (2) – Misdemeanor motor vehicle homicide - under the influence 
1219  (2)No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public way under the influence of 
1220 intoxicating liquor, drugs, or other substances and by such operation cause the death of another 
1221 person. 
1222  A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in the jail or house of 
1223 correction for not less than 30 days but not more than 2 ½ years or fined not less than $300 but 
1224 not more than $3,000, or both. No case commenced under this subsection shall be continued 
1225 without a finding or placed on file. 

60 of 69 1226  Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall suspend the license or right to 
1227 operate as follows: 
1228  (a)First offense: 15 years after the date of conviction 
1229  (b)Subsequent offense: Lifetime 
1230  Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b) above, if a person is convicted under 
1231 this subsection and has a prior operating under the influence offense, the registrar shall suspend 
1232 his license or right to operate for life. 
1233  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
1234 operate, provided; however, if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is 
1235 found not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, 
1236 for the purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the 
1237 court finds that the charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol 
1238 related charges pending in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a 
1239 preponderance of the evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would 
1240 endanger the public, there shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular 
1241 suspension be terminated. 
1242  Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $50 fee to the person. The 
1243 court shall transmit the $50 to the state treasurer to be deposited into the Victims of Drunk 
1244 Driving Trust Fund. The assessment shall not be subject to waiver by the court for any reason. If 
1245 the court sentences the person to a correctional facility the outstanding assessment shall be noted 
1246 on the mittimus. 

61 of 69 1247  Chapter 90, § 24K (3) – Felony motor vehicle homicide 
1248  (3)No person shall operate a motor vehicle negligently or recklessly on a public way so 
1249 that the lives or safety of the public might be endangered while under the influence of 
1250 intoxicating liquor, drugs, or other substances and by such operation cause the death of another 
1251 person. 
1252  A person convicted under this subsection shall be imprisoned in a jail or house of 
1253 correction for a minimum mandatory term of 1 year but not more than 2 ½ years, or state prison 
1254 for not less than 2 ½ years but not more than 15 years with a minimum mandatory term of 1 year 
1255 and fined not more than $5,000. No case commenced under this subsection shall be continued 
1256 without a finding or placed on file. 
1257  Upon a conviction under this subsection the registrar shall suspend the license or right to 
1258 operate as follows: 
1259  (a)First offense: 15 years after the date of conviction 
1260  (b)Subsequent offense: Lifetime 
1261  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the licenseor right to 
1262 operate, provided; however, if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is 
1263 found not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, 
1264 for the purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the 
1265 court finds that the charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol 
1266 related charges pending in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a 
1267 preponderance of the evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would 

62 of 69 1268 endanger the public, there shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular 
1269 suspension be terminated. 
1270  Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b) above, if a person is convicted under 
1271 this subsection and has a prior operating under the influence offense, the registrar shall suspend 
1272 his license or right to operate for life. 
1273  Upon a disposition under this section the court shall assess a $50 fee to the person. The 
1274 court shall transmit the $50 to the state treasurer to be deposited into the Victims of Drunk 
1275 Driving Trust Fund. The assessment shall not be subject to waiver by the court for any reason. If 
1276 the court sentences the person to a correctional facility the outstanding assessment shall be noted 
1277 on the mittimus. 
1278  Chapter 90, § 24L - Manslaughter by motor vehicle 
1279  (1)No person shall operate a motor vehicle wantonly and recklessly on a public way 
1280 while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs, or other substances and by such operation 
1281 cause the death of another person. 
1282  A person convicted under this section shall be imprisoned in state prison for a minimum 
1283 mandatory term of 5 years but not more than 20 years and fined not more than $25,000. 
1284  (b)Upon a conviction of this section the registrar shall suspend the license or right to 
1285 operate for 15 years to life. Any person aggrieved by the registrar’s decision may file an appeal 
1286 in the superior court. If the court determines that the registrar abused his discretion, the court 
1287 may vacate and reduce the suspension of the license or the right to operate as ordered by the 
1288 registrar. In no case shall the suspension period be less than 15 years. 

63 of 69 1289  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
1290 operate, provided; however, if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is 
1291 found not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, 
1292 for the purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the 
1293 court finds that the charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol 
1294 related charges pending in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a 
1295 preponderance of the evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would 
1296 endanger the public, there shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular 
1297 suspension be terminated. 
1298  (c)Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) above, if a person convicted under 
1299 this section has a prior operating under the influence offense, the registrar shall suspend his 
1300 license or right to operate for life. 
1301  Chapter 90, § 24M - Alcohol education for law enforcement personnel; duties of officials 
1302 and agencies 
1303  The officials and agencies designated in this section are hereby directed to perform the 
1304 duties in this section and any other action within their authority in order to ensure effective 
1305 enforcement of chapter 90 section 24 to 24M, inclusive. 
1306  (1)The municipal police training committee established in section 116 of chapter 6 shall 
1307 provide training, including but not limited to, education concerning the aforesaid sections to all 
1308 law enforcement personnel throughout the commonwealth. 
1309  (2)The chief administrative justice of the trial court department shall provide training, 
1310 including but not limited to education concerning the aforesaid sections to all appropriate court 

64 of 69 1311 personnel throughout the commonwealth, including but not limited to, judges, district attorneys 
1312 and probation officers. 
1313  (3)The courts of the Commonwealth shall give priority to the speedy and effective 
1314 disposition of all matters under the aforesaid sections. 
1315  (4)The executive office of public safety shall establish and implement an alcohol 
1316 sensitive selective traffic enforcement program. 
1317  SECTION 4. Chapter 90B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
1318 following:- 
1319  Section 8B ½ - 
1320  (5)No person shall operate a vessel on the waters of the commonwealth wantonly and 
1321 recklessly while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs, or other substances and by 
1322 such operation cause the death of another person. 
1323  A person convicted under this section shall be imprisoned in state prison for a minimum 
1324 mandatory term of 5 years but not more than 20 years and fined not more than $25,000. 
1325  Upon a conviction of this section the registrar shall suspend the person’s license or right 
1326 to operate for 15 years to life. Any person aggrieved by the registrar’s decision may file an 
1327 appeal in the superior court. If the court determines that the registrar abused his discretion, the 
1328 court may vacate and reduce the suspension of the license or suspension of the right to operate as 
1329 ordered by the registrar. In no case shall the suspension or suspension period be less than 15 
1330 years. 

65 of 69 1331  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
1332 operate, provided; however, if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is 
1333 found not guilty, the person may immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, 
1334 for the purpose of seeking restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the 
1335 court finds that the charges were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol 
1336 related charges pending in any court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a 
1337 preponderance of the evidence that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would 
1338 endanger the public, there shall be a presumption that the court shall order that this particular 
1339 suspension be terminated. 
1340  Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) above, if a person convicted under this 
1341 section has a prior operating under the influence offense, the registrar shall suspend his license or 
1342 right to operate for life 
1343  SECTION 5. Section 13 ½ of chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby repealed. 
1344  SECTION 6. Section 28 of chapter 266 is hereby amended by inserting at the end:- 
1345  (a)Whoever knowingly uses a motor vehicle without authority shall be punished as 
1346 follows: 
1347  (1)First offense: The defendant shall be imprisoned in the jail or house of correction for 
1348 not less than 30 days but not more than 2 years, or fined not less than $50 but not more than $500 
1349 or both. 

66 of 69 1350  (2)Second offense: The defendant shall be imprisoned in jail or house of correction for 
1351 not less than 30 days but not more than 2 ½ years, or state prison for not more than 5 years, or 
1352 fined not less than $1000, or both. 
1353  (3)Third offense within 5 years: The defendant shall be imprisoned in jail or house of 
1354 correction for not less than 6 months but not more than 2 ½ years, or state prison for not less than 
1355 2 ½ years but not more than 5 years, or a fine of not less than $200 but not more than $1,000, or 
1356 both. 
1357  Upon a conviction of this subsection the registrar shall, unless the court or magistrate 
1358 recommends otherwise, suspend the license or right to operate as follows: 
1359  (a)First offense: 1 year 
1360  (b)Subsequent offense: 3 years 
1361  No appeal or motion for a new trial shall stay the suspension of the license or right to 
1362 operate, provided; however, that if the prosecution against such person has terminated in his 
1363 favor, the registrar shall immediately reinstate his license or right to operate provided; however, 
1364 if the charges against the person are dismissed, or the person is found not guilty, the person may 
1365 immediately file a motion before the judge that heard the case, for the purpose of seeking 
1366 restoration of the license or right to operate. At said hearing, if the court finds that the charges 
1367 were resolved in favor of the defendant, that there are no alcohol related charges pending in any 
1368 court, and that there is no evidence before the court based on a preponderance of the evidence 
1369 that reinstatement of the license or right to operate would endanger the public, there shall be a 
1370 presumption that the court shall order that this particular suspension be terminated. 

67 of 69 1371  (4)Upon a conviction of this section, if it appears from the records of the registrar that the 
1372 person convicted is the owner of the motor vehicle or has exclusive control of any motor vehicle 
1373 as a manufacturer or dealer or otherwise, the registrar may suspend the certificate of registration 
1374 of any or all motor vehicles owned or exclusively controlled by the person. 
1375  (5) A summons may be issued instead of a warrant for arrest upon a complaint for a 
1376 violation of this section if there is reason to believe the defendant will appear before the court. 
1377  If a motor vehicle is used in connection with the commission of a felony, of any larceny, 
1378 or of any offense punishable under any provision of sections 22, 113 to 117, inclusive, and 120 
1379 of chapter 266, or sections 13 of 269, of which a person is convicted, the material facts relative 
1380 to such use, including the registration number of the vehicle, so far as disclosed in the 
1381 proceedings, shall be reported forthwith to the registrar by the clerk of the court in which the 
1382 underlying conviction occurs. 
1383  SECTION 7. Section 28(a) of chapter 266 is hereby amended by inserting subsection (d) 
1384 as follows:- 
1385  (d) Persons convicted of using a motor vehicle without authority under the provisions of 
1386 paragraph (a) of section 28 shall be liable in a civil action to the owner of such vehicle, if it is 
1387 recovered, for all towing and storage charges necessitated and all property damage caused to said 
1388 vehicle by such use without authority. 
1389  SECTION 8. Section 24(2) (a) of chapter 90 is hereby amended by striking from lines 
1390 720, 721, 722, and 723 the following:- or upon a bet or wager or in a race, or whoever operates a 
1391 motor vehicle for the purpose of making a record and thereby violates any provision of section 
1392 seventeen or any regulation under section eighteen 

68 of 69 1393  SECTION 9. Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended after section 17B by 
1394 adding the following:- 
1395  Section 17B ½. No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public way upon a bet or 
1396 wager or in a race, or whoever operates a motor vehicle for the purpose of making a record and 
1397 thereby violates any provision of section seventeen or any regulation under section eighteen. 
1398 Whoever violates this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than 2 weeks but 
1399 not more than 2 years or a fine of not less than twenty dollar nor more than two hundred dollars, 
1400 or both. 
1401  SECTION 10. Chapter 266 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
1402 following:- 
1403  Section 29A - 
1404  (6) No person shall remove an abandoned or stolen motor vehicle on a public way as 
1405 defined in section 1 of chapter 90 without the express consent of the owner of such vehicle or 
1406 without the written permission of the police department. The owner or operator of a motor 
1407 vehicle that is designed to carry or tow another vehicle shall be licensed for that specific purpose 
1408 or as a towing service. 
1409  The owner of any machine that is designed to crush, mutilate or destroy a motor vehicle, 
1410 whether the machine be mobile or affixed permanently, shall have that machine listed with the 
1411 registry of motor vehicles. 
1412  If the owner or agent of a salvage or junk yard transports crushed or mutilated vehicles 
1413 without the commonwealth for purposes of resale, the operator of the transporting vehicle shall 

69 of 69 1414 carry a list of the vehicles being transported, and a copy of such list shall be forwarded to said 
1415 registrar. 
1416  (c) Any person convicted under this section shall be imprisoned for not less than 2 years, 
1417 a fine of not less than $1,000, or both. 
1418  (d) Any person convicted under this section shall forfeit, to the registrar, any license 
1419 issued which is related to such violation.